Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3129
Program administration; services
for clients; dedicated caseworkers; specialized department employees or units.

(1) The Department
of Health and Human Services shall provide high-quality services for clients
who apply for or receive benefits under public benefit programs administered
by the department.

(2) The department
shall utilize department caseworkers who are located in call centers, dedicated
caseworkers, and specialized department employees or units who will provide
in-person assistance to specific clients.

(3) Upon the request of the client, dedicated
caseworkers shall, at a minimum, be utilized for persons with chronic physical
or mental disorders and the elderly that require the provision of medical
and personal care services on a recurring or continuing basis.

(4) Specialized
department employees or units shall, at a minimum, be utilized for complex
cases, including medicaid waiver cases, medicaid spousal impoverishment cases,
disability cases, and other similar cases upon request of the client.

(5) The dedicated
caseworkers and specialized department employees or units shall be placed
in the existing local offices and shall be accessible to department caseworkers
in call centers.

Laws 2012, LB825, § 3.